src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/ca.dic
acaramel lat/EVY
acienti/D
acrimoni s/IVY
actinoter pia/EVY
adequaci /GVY
aeropiezisme/EVY
afai onem/D
afectu s/IVY
aft s/IVY
agostador/EVY
agravaci /GVY
agredol /IVY
aigualegi/D
aiguamoix/IVY
alab s/IVY
alcaic/EVY
alfard /GVY
alfic s/IVY
alumenada/EVY
alumin s/IVY
amatoni/D
americana/GVY
amiotr fia/EVY
anest sia/EVY
angoix s/IVY
anteposici /GVY
antinatural/EVY
antivariol s/IVY
aparta/D
apilada/EVY
aquit /GVY
arbo /IVY
arcabussejada/EVY
arpelleja/D
arrap s/IVY
arribat/EVY
assenyada/EVY
assetgi/D
assiriana/GVY
astomat s/IVY
atrofiada/EVY
autovacc /GVY
avantpa s/IVY
avergonyeixi/D
aviciat/EVY
bardissam/E
barom tric/F
barrat/BE
begui/D
benedicci /G
benent s/I
bergantell/F
besantat/B
bicarpel lar/E
blanc/F
blau/B
boix/IJ
borradura/E
bossut/B
botal /G
bouenc/F
branquegi/D
brufat/B
buixot/E
burgmestre/F
calabrotat/B
calaix/I
calidosc pic/F
calua/E
cal ligrafitzaci /G
camanduleja/D
canusit/B
capellaner/F
caragolament/E
carbonejat/B
carnificaci /G
cartutx/I
castelloner/F
cat ter/E
cautxuta/D
cavallonat/B
centralitzador/F
ciclocr s/I
ciclohex /G
cisma/E
ciutadejat/B
civader/F
coexistit/B
cognici /G
colltort/EF
colltrenca/D
color/E
combregat/B
compungit/B
comunicaci /G
conc ntric/F
configuri/D
conformat/B
conniv ncia/E
conspiraci /G
constatat/B
contradictor/F
contrapunxonat/B
contrap s/I
contrasegelli/D
coparticipaci /G
corimbe/E
corsecador/F
crestejat/B
cronogr fic/F
cronometria/E
csi/G
cucleja/D
curs/I
c rnic/F
decreixen a/E
defensiu/B
deflexi /G
demogr fic/F
denigri/D
desadherit/B
desagregaci /G
desarnesi/D
desblocat/B
descolonitzi/D
desdejunat/B
desemmanta/D
desempomat/B
desencortini/D
desengolfat/B
desensuperbesqui/D
desfardat/B
desgranador/F
designa/D
desincorporaci /G
desmesclat/B
despampola/D
dessalat/B
destrucci /G
desvira/D
devorador/F
digerit/B
dijous/I
dinamiter/F
discent/E
discussi /G
distregui/D
di dic/F
dosificat/B
duod /G
d ltic/F
eleg aca/EVY
elogi s/IVY
emasculaci /GVY
embadoca/D
emmalalteixi/D
empini/D
empotingada/EVY
encal /IVY
encarcanya/D
enderi n/D
enforcada/EVY
enganyapastors/IVY
engarbulli/D
ennuvoli/D
entatxoni/D
entom fag/EVY
ent s/IVY
enva u/D
equiparaci /GVY
esblanque t/EVY
esbornagui/D
escalfaplats/IVY
escat s/IVY
esclafassi/D
escurapous/IVY
esfigm graf/EVY
esgrifolla/D
espal laci /GVY
espars/IVY
espicassa/D
espuri/EVY
esqueix/IVY
esterifica/D
estoniana/GVY
estrepit s/IVY
esverat/EVY
exclami/D
excorticaci /GVY
extrapl /GVY
extrors/IVY
fanguer/E
fecundi/D
feldspato dic/F
fertirrigaci /G
filtrador/F
finan at/B
flint-glass/I
fomentador/F
forceja/D
formataci /G
fosfur/E
fraresc/F
fraternitzat/B
f lmic/F
gallim /G
garfesqui/D
gas/I
gasejat/B
ga lic/F
giga/E
ginomonoic/F
glaciaci /G
gramaticastre/F
groc/B
gronxoli/D
guardabra /I
guixoter/F
havana/GVY
hemicel lulosa/EVY
hipoclor s/IVY
hipog stric/FVY
homogene tzaci /GVY
illa/EVY
illenc/FVY
implanta/D
implorat/BVY
imprevisi /GY
incr dul/FVY
induraci /GY
infantat/BEVY
infix/IVY
instil la/D
instil laci /GY
intercontinental/EVY
interrogatiu/BVY
invocaci /GY
involut/FVY
la citzar/D
lectiu/B
lexicogr fic/F
lexic /G
llac/E
llepadits/I
llonz /G
llu t/B
l mnic/F
magregi/D
malvapeix/I
mangala/E
manxat/B
maquetaci /G
marer/F
matallops/I
ma olar/D
mesur /G
metaling  stic/F
migrolat/B
migtemps/I
mil lenarisme/E
moliner/F
mol lificaci /G
mut/B
m gic/F
natal/E
nat /G
novel lesc/F
obag s/IVY
obnubila/D
obtenci /GVY
of s/IVY
oleogr fica/EVY
ordi s/IVY
ortic /GVY
pairal/E
palpitat/B
parraquer/F
parti /G
passa-rius/I
peonat/B
peralt/E
permutaci /G
perora/D
perspica /I
pertorbador/F
pixat/BE
plat /EG
plebs/I
plomaller/F
poda/DE
portaescuradents/I
postraci /G
potenciador/F
predisposat/B
privi/D
prospectiu/B
pros lit/F
prussianisme/E
punci /G
queix/I
quim ric/F
raptat/B
receptacular/E
recobra/D
reconegut/B
reduplicaci /G
reflector/F
reflux/I
regitat/B
repalegi/D
repenedit/B
rep s/I
retortill /G
retor ut/B
revisor/F
roina/DE
rotllat/BE
rufianeja/D
sala /I
santificador/F
selecci /G
sender/E
sentenciat/B
significador/F
sis/I
soguejat/B
somni /D
sorrejador/F
sublimaci /G
subsistent/E
suggerit/B
tafarrer/F
tapajunts/I
termenat/B
term fil/F
terrissaire/E
testificaci /G
tirapits/I
tonifica/D
transigit/B
trapasser/F
tra /I
triomfant/CE
troleib s/I
tudat/B
tud /G
t pic/F
veda/DE
vergassejat/B
versallesc/F
vet/E
voltadits/I
xamfr /G
xemicat/B
xuplador/F
